Maryland, session 2025, HB0184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–118.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0184*

HOUSE BILL 184
(2) (I) “DEBT” MEANS ANY MONEY, OBLIGATION, CLAIM, OR SUM
DUE OR OWED BY A STUDENT OR FORMER STUDENT TO A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL.
(II) “DEBT” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE FEE, IF ANY, CHARGED TO
A STUDENT FOR THE ACTUAL COSTS OF PROVIDING A TRANSCRIPT.
(3) “NONPUBLIC SCHOOL” MEANS A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE
STATE THAT PARTICIPATES IN STATE–FUNDED EDUCATION PROGRAMS.
(4) “STUDENT” INCLUDES CURRENT STUDENTS AND FORMER
STUDENTS OF A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL.
(B) A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL MAY NOT:
(1) REFUSE TO ISSUE A TRANSCRIPT TO A STUDENT OR THE PARENT
OR GUARDIAN OF A STUDENT BECAUSE THE STUDENT OWES A DEBT;
(2) CONDITION THE ISSUANCE OF A TRANSCRIPT ON THE PAYMENT
OF A DEBT;
(3) CHARGE A HIGHER FEE FOR OBTAINING A TRANSCRIPT BECAUSE
THE STUDENT OWES A DEBT;
(4) PROVIDE LESS FAVORABLE TREATMENT OF A TRANSCRIPT
REQUEST BECAUSE A STUDENT OWES A DEBT; OR
(5) USE TRANSCRIPT ISSUANCE AS A TOOL OF DEBT COLLECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.